Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.020

Definitions and rules of interpretation.

(1) For the purpose of this chapter:

(a) "Arbitration" means any arbitration whether or not administered by a permanent arbitral institution.

(b) "Arbitral tribunal" means a sole arbitrator or a panel of arbitrators.

(c) "Commercial" means matters arising from all relationships of a commercial nature, whether contractual or not, including, but not limited to, any of the following transactions:

(i) A transaction for the supply or exchange of goods or services;

(ii) A distribution agreement;

(iii) A commercial representation or agency;

(iv) An exploitation agreement or concession;

(v) A joint venture or other related form of industrial or business cooperation;

(vi) The carriage of goods or passengers by air, sea, rail, or road;

(vii) Construction;

(viii) Insurance;

(ix) Licensing;

(x) Factoring;

(xi) Leasing;

(xii) Consulting;

(xiii) Engineering;

(xiv) Financing;

(xv) Banking;

(xvi) The transfer of data or technology;

(xvii) Intellectual or industrial property, including trademarks, patents, copyrights, and software programs; and

(xviii) Professional services.

(d) "Court" means a body or organ of the judicial system of this state.

(2) Where a provision of this chapter, except RCW 7.05.390, leaves the parties free to determine a certain issue, such freedom includes the right of the parties to authorize a third party, including an institution, to make that determination.

(3) Where a provision of this chapter refers to the fact that the parties have agreed, that they may agree, or in any other way refers to an agreement of the parties, such agreement includes any arbitration rules referred to in that agreement.

(4) Where a provision of this chapter, other than in RCW 7.05.360(1) and 7.05.430(2)(a), refers to a claim, it also applies to a counterclaim, and where it refers to a defense, it also applies to a defense to such counterclaim.

[ 2015 c 276 s 2.]